Louisiana, session 2026, HB861.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The legislature finds that abolishing certain boards, commissions, and
other statutorily created entities and funds is in the public interest when such entities are
inactive. Pursuant to the recommendations contained in the October 1, 2025, Legislative
Auditor Report to the Legislature titled "Boards, Commissions, and Like Entities" and other
information, it is the intent of the legislature to abolish, boards, commissions, and other
statutorily created entities as provided in this Act.
Advisory Commission for Louisiana's Energy, Environment, and Restoration
Section 2.(A) R.S. 30:521(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§521. Merger and consolidation of agencies or functions
A. In order to merge and consolidate into one agency, under authority of
Section 32 of Article III of the Constitution of 1921, certain executive and
administrative offices, boards, commissions and agencies of the state of Louisiana
whose duties and functions are of a similar nature or character, the following named
offices, boards, commissions and agencies are merged and consolidated into the
Department of Conservation and Energy:
(1) The natural gas committee or commission authorized by R.S. 30:401 et
seq.
* * *
(B) Part I of Chapter 6 of Title 30 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 30:401 through 403, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Advisory Subcommittee of the Accountability Commission
Section 3. R.S. 17:3883(A)(6) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Byways Commission
Section 4.(A) R.S. 56:1948.4(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1948.4. Regional development; legislative committee approval
* * *
B. After approval by the Louisiana Byways Commission, the Department of
Culture, Recreation and Tourism, and the Department of Transportation and
Development, a proposed byway shall be presented to the House and Senate
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 861 ENROLLED
Committees on Transportation, Highways and Public Works by the recommending
agent and shall be approved by a majority of the members of each committee prior
to its inclusion in the Louisiana Byway Program.
* * *
(B) R.S. 36:209(D)(1) and R.S. 56:1948.4(A)(2) and Part III-A of Chapter 9 of Title
56 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 56:1948.11 through
1948.13, are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Centers of Excellence Financing Corporation
Section 5. Chapter 17-F of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 39:1800.21 through 1800.35, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Centers of Excellence Program Advisory Board
Section 6. R.S. 17:1875 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Clerks of Court Certification Program Committee
Section 7.(A) R.S. 13:782(J)(2)(a) and (b) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§782. Compensation of clerks
* * *
J.
* * *
(2)(a) Documents showing the successful completion of the certification
program shall be submitted to and approved by the certification committee. Upon
approval of the application for certification, a person holding the office of clerk of
court shall receive the designation of Certified Clerk of Court, (CCC), and notice of
the approval shall be forwarded to the legislative auditor by the certification
committee.
(b) If, on July 1, 1990, a clerk has completed the educational and experience
requirements as provided in Subsection I of this Section and the documents showing
the successful completion of the program have been submitted to and approved by
the certification committee and said approval documented to the legislative auditor,
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 861 ENROLLED
the clerk shall be granted a seven percent increase in compensation to his annual
salary as set forth in Subsection A of this Section.
* * *
(B) R.S. 13:782(J)(1) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Coastal Protection and Restoration Financing Corporation
Section 8.(A) R.S. 49:214.5.4(G)(8) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§214.5.4. Funding and resource allocation
* * *
G. The money in the Coastal Protection and Restoration Fund is subject to
appropriations by the legislature for the purposes of integrated coastal protection.
The money in the fund may be used only for those projects and programs which are
consistent with the statement of intent, R.S. 49:214.1, and the annual plan as it
pertains to the integrated coastal protection and may include but not be limited to the
following purposes:
* * *
(8) The administration and operation of the Coastal Protection and
Restoration Authority, the Coastal Protection and Restoration Authority Board, and
the Governor's Advisory Commission on Coastal Protection, Restoration, and
Conservation, and the Coastal Protection and Restoration Financing Corporation.
* * *
(B) Subpart F-1 of Part II-A of Chapter 1 of Subtitle I of Title 39 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 39:99.26 through 99.46, is hereby repealed in
its entirety.
ENCORE Louisiana Commission
Section. 9. R.S. 36:4(D)(1), R.S. 43:111(A)(9), and Chapter 10-A of Title 51 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 51:1317 through 1319, are hereby
repealed in their entirety.
Energy Code Commission
Section 10. R.S. 40:1730.28.4 and 1730.28.5(C) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 861 ENROLLED
Equal Pay Commission
Section 11. Chapter 13 of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 23:2021 through 2024, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Floodplain Evaluation and Management Commission
Section 12. R.S. 38:90.2 and 90.5(A) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Louisiana Health Plan
Section 13. Subpart J of Part III of Chapter 4 of Title 22 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 22:1201 through 1220, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Housing and Transportation Planning and Coordinating Commission
Section 14. R.S. 40:600.91(A)(28)(b) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Hunting and Fishing Advisory Education Council
Section 15. R.S. 36:610(C)(2) and Part XIII-A of Chapter 1 of Title 56 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 56:699.21 and 699.22, are hereby
repealed in their entirety.
Latino Commission
Section 16. R.S. 36:4(B)(34) and Chapter 19 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 49:1221 through 1223, are hereby repealed in their
entirety.
Louisiana Juvenile Jurisdiction Planning Implementation Committee
Section 17. Chapter 13-A of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 15:1441 and 1442, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Louisiana Music Trail Commission
Section 18. R.S. 36:209(A)(10) and Part VII of Chapter 9 of Title 56 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 56:1950.21 through 1950.26, are
hereby repealed in their entirety.
Louisiana Quincentenary Commission
Section 19. Chapter 23-A of Title 25 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 25:1021 through 1027, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Parks and Recreation Commission
Section 20.(A) R.S. 25:521(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 861 ENROLLED
§521. Board; appointment; terms; meetings
A. The Louisiana Commission on Cultural Resources shall hereafter be
designated as the Louisiana Historical Preservation and Cultural Commission. It
shall be composed of fourteen members selected from the following sources: one
member each to be designated by the respective presidents thereof from Louisiana
State University, Louisiana Tech University, Tulane University, Southern University
and University of Southwestern Louisiana the University of Louisiana at Lafayette;
one member each designated by the Louisiana Architects Association, Louisiana
Landmarks Society, Louisiana Historical Association, Foundation for Historical
Louisiana and the Louisiana Geneological and Historical Society; and one member
each, serving ex officio, from State Archives and Records Commission the
Department of State, State Parks and Recreation Commission, Department of
Culture, Recreation and Tourism, Louisiana State Museum, and State Tourist
Development Commission.
* * *
(B) R.S. 41:1501 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1501. Lease of lakes, bays and coves
The register of the State Land Office, with the concurrence and approval of
the governor, is hereby authorized and empowered to lease on behalf of the state any
portion or part of any meandered state-owned lake, bay, cove or the bed and bottom
thereof or state-owned lands reclaimed therefrom to any governing authority of a
parish or municipality or any combination thereof, the Louisiana Wildlife and
Fisheries Commission, the State Parks and Recreation Commission, the Department
of Culture, Recreation and Tourism, and the Louisiana State Department of
Highways for use primarily for public recreational purposes; provided, however, that
said leases may only be entered into with the aforementioned municipal and parish
governing authorities or any combination thereof, when the geographical territory
encompassed by said governing authorities is directly adjacent to the lake, bay, cove
or any part thereof or the bed and bottom thereof or lands reclaimed therefrom. In
the case of leases to the State Parks and Recreation Commission, the Department of
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 861 ENROLLED
Culture, Recreation and Tourism, the State Wildlife and Fisheries Commission,
and/or the State Department of Highways, said leases may be granted on a statewide
basis subject to all conditions and requirements as provided for under the provisions
of this Chapter. Subject to the approval of the register of the State Land Office, and
with the concurrence of the attorney general, the political body who has been granted
a lease under the provisions of this Chapter may place improvements in and on the
leased property, and after obtaining approval of the register may assign or sublease
such lease; provided, however, that any political body subleasing or assigning its
lease as herein authorized shall supervise its sublessee or assign to insure that the
terms and conditions of the original lease are observed, and provided, further, such
assignment or sublease shall be only to the highest responsible bidder after
advertisement in accordance with R.S. 41:1213 through 1215.1.
Any lease made by the register of the State Land Office pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter shall be on behalf of the state of Louisiana except that, as
to any lake, bay, cove and the bed and bottom thereof and land reclaimed therefrom,
or part thereof, not under the jurisdiction and control of the state of Louisiana, the
lease shall be made on behalf of the political body or entity having such jurisdiction
and control and only at its request.
(C) R.S. 49:966(B)(3)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§966. Review of agency rules; fees
* * *
B.
* * *
(3)
* * *
(b) The office of state parks and the State Parks and Recreation Commission
shall submit the report to the House Committee on Municipal, Parochial and Cultural
Affairs and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources.
* * *
(D) R.S. 36:209(A)(2) and R.S. 56:1681 are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 861 ENROLLED
Process Technology Advisory Board
Section 21. R.S. 17:3398.2(B), (C), (D), and (E) and R.S. 36:651(K)(2) are hereby
repealed in their entirety.
Rural Water Infrastructure Committee
Section 22. R.S. 36:4(B)(18) and Part VII of Chapter 2 of Title 49 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 49:220.31 through 220.33, are hereby repealed
in their entirety.
Louisiana Sentencing Commission
Section 23.(A) R.S. 15:574.21(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§574.21. Parole risk assessment pilot program; statistical system; agency
cooperation; rules promulgation
* * *
D. Contingent upon the availability of funding, the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections and the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and the
Administration of Criminal Justice shall provide the necessary resources, including
clerical and administrative personnel, required by the committee on parole to
establish, implement and evaluate the risk assessment pilot program. Specifically,
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, the Louisiana Commission on Law
Enforcement and the Administration of Criminal Justice, the Louisiana Sentencing
Commission, and the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information
shall provide technical assistance to the committee on parole, and shall make
available all facts, records, information, data and data processing assistance required
by the committee.
* * *
(B) Chapter 1-A of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of
R.S. 15:321 through 324, and R.S. 49:966(B)(23) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
State Buildings and Lands Highest and Best Use Advisory Group
Section 24. Part XI-A of Chapter 1 of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 39:332.1, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 861 ENROLLED
Waste Tire Task Force
Section 25. Section 3 of Act No. 323 of the 2013 Regular Session of the Legislature
and Section 2 of Act No. 427 of the 2015 Regular Session of the Legislature are hereby
repealed in their entirety.
Section 26. R.S. 36:508.4 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.